Florida, session 2026, SB766.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âPresent subsections (2) through (48) of section 22 403.703, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (3) 23 through (49), respectively, a new subsection (2) is added to 24 that section, and present subsection (35) of that section is 25 amended, to read: 26 403.703âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 27 (2)ââAuxiliary containerâ means a reusable or single-use 28 bag, cup, bottle, can, or other packaging that meets both of the 29 following requirements: 30 (a)âIs made of cloth; paper; plastic, including, but not 31 limited to, foamed plastic, expanded plastic, or polystyrene; 32 cardboard or corrugated material; molded fiber; aluminum; glass; 33 postconsumer recycled material; or similar material or 34 substrates, including coated, laminated, or multilayer 35 substrates. 36 (b)âIs designed for transporting, consuming, or protecting 37 merchandise, food, or beverages from or at a public food service 38 establishment as defined in s. 509.013(5), a food establishment 39 as defined in s. 500.03(1), or a retailer as defined in s. 40 212.02(13). 41 (36)(35)ââSolid wasteâ means sludge unregulated under the 42 federal Clean Water Act or Clean Air Act, sludge from a waste 43 treatment works, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution 44 control facility, or garbage, rubbish, refuse, special waste, or 45 other discarded material, including solid, liquid, semisolid, or 46 contained gaseous material resulting from domestic, industrial, 47 commercial, mining, agricultural, or governmental operations. 48 Recovered materials as defined in subsection (29) (28) and post 49 use polymers as defined in subsection (25) (24) are not solid 50 waste. 51 Section 2.âSection 403.7033, Florida Statutes, is amended 52 to read: 53 403.7033âRegulation of auxiliary containers Departmental 54 analysis of particular recyclable materials.âThe Legislature 55 finds that prudent regulation of recyclable materials is crucial 56 to the ongoing welfare of Floridaâs ecology and economy. As 57 such, the Department of Environmental Protection shall review 58 and update its 2010 report on retail bags analyzing the need for 59 new or different regulation of auxiliary containers, wrappings, 60 or disposable plastic bags used by consumers to carry products 61 from retail establishments. The updated report must include 62 input from state and local government agencies, stakeholders, 63 private businesses, and citizens and must evaluate the efficacy 64 and necessity of both statewide and local regulation of these 65 materials. To ensure consistent and effective implementation, 66 the department shall submit the updated report with conclusions 67 and recommendations to the Legislature no later than December 68 31, 2021. Until such time that the Legislature adopts the 69 recommendations of the department, 70 (1)âExcept as provided in s. 500.90, the regulation of 71 auxiliary containers is expressly preempted to the state. A 72 local government, local governmental agency, or state 73 governmental agency may not enact or enforce any rule, 74 regulation, or ordinance regarding the use, disposition, sale, 75 prohibition, restriction, or tax of such auxiliary containers 76 unless explicitly permitted by law. 77 (2)âRules, regulations, or ordinances restricting the use 78 of glass auxiliary containers within the boundaries of any 79 public beach are explicitly permitted. 80 (3)âThe Division of Recreation and Parks of the Department 81 of Environmental Protection may regulate auxiliary containers 82 within state parks consistent with its grant of authority in s. 83 258.004, wrappings, or disposable plastic bags. 84 (4)âLocal ordinances and restrictions authorized under s. 85 500.90 are permitted. 86 Section 3.âParagraph (j) of subsection (9) of section 87 403.707, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 88 403.707âPermits.â 89 (9)âThe department shall establish a separate category for 90 solid waste management facilities that accept only construction 91 and demolition debris for disposal or recycling. The department 92 shall establish a reasonable schedule for existing facilities to 93 comply with this section to avoid undue hardship to such 94 facilities. However, a permitted solid waste disposal unit that 95 receives a significant amount of waste prior to the compliance 96 deadline established in this schedule shall not be required to 97 be retrofitted with liners or leachate control systems. 98 (j)âThe Legislature recognizes that recycling, waste 99 reduction, and resource recovery are important aspects of an 100 integrated solid waste management program and as such are 101 necessary to protect the public health and the environment. If 102 necessary to promote such an integrated program, the county may 103 determine, after providing notice and an opportunity for a 104 hearing prior to April 30, 2008, that some or all of the 105 material described in s. 403.703(7)(b) must s. 403.703(6)(b) 106 shall be excluded from the definition of âconstruction and 107 demolition debrisâ in s. 403.703(7) s. 403.703(6) within the 108 jurisdiction of such county. The county may make such a 109 determination only if it finds that, prior to June 1, 2007, the 110 county has established an adequate method for the use or 111 recycling of such wood material at an existing or proposed solid 112 waste management facility that is permitted or authorized by the 113 department on June 1, 2007. The county is not required to hold a 114 hearing if the county represents that it previously has held a 115 hearing for such purpose, or if the county represents that it 116 previously has held a public meeting or hearing that authorized 117 such method for the use or recycling of trash or other 118 nonputrescible waste materials and that such materials include 119 those materials described in s. 403.703(7)(b) s. 403.703(6)(b). 120 The county shall provide written notice of its determination to 121 the department by no later than April 30, 2008; thereafter, the 122 materials described in s. 403.703(7) are s. 403.703(6) shall be 123 excluded from the definition of âconstruction and demolition 124 debrisâ in s. 403.703(7) s. 403.703(6) within the jurisdiction 125 of such county. The county may withdraw or revoke its 126 determination at any time by providing written notice to the 127 department. 128 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.